Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 31. Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

Administrative Code. —

For state training and employment program, see 8 AAC 87.

Sec. 44.31.010.
Commissioner of labor and workforce development.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development is the commissioner of labor and workforce development.

History.

(§ 13 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 44.31.020.
Duties of department.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall

enforce the laws and adopt regulations under them concerning employer-employee relationships, including the safety, hours of work, wages, and conditions of workers, including children;

accumulate, analyze, and report labor statistics;

operate systems of workers’ compensation and unemployment insurance;

gather data reflecting the cost of living in various locations of the state upon request of the director of personnel under AS

39.27.030

;

operate the federally funded employment and training programs under 29 U.S.C. 2801 — 2945 (Workforce Investment Act of 1998);

administer the state’s program of adult basic education and adopt regulations to administer the program; and

administer the programs of the Alaska Vocational Technical Center and adopt regulations to administer the programs, including regulations that set rates for student tuition and room and board and fees for the programs and services provided by the department regarding the Alaska Vocational Technical Center.

History.

(§ 13 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 226 SLA 1970; am § 112 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 19 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am § 54 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 94 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 45 ch 86 SLA 2002; am § 61 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 2004; am § 18 ch 47 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1980 “workers’ ” was substituted for “workmen’s” in (3) of this section under § 60, ch. 94, SLA 1980.

Administrative Code. —

For tuition rates and fees for programs and courses at Alaska Vocational Technical Center, see 8 AAC 82, art. 1.

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

For adult education diplomas, see 8 AAC 99, art. 1.

For high school equivalency test, see 8 AAC 99, art. 2.

For adult basic education grants, see 8 AAC 99, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (4), which read “gather data reflecting the cost of living in the various election districts of the state upon request of the director of personnel under AS

39.27.030

; in this paragraph, ‘election district’ has the meaning given in AS

39.27.020(b)

”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 85, SLA 2004 (HB 489), adding paragraph (7) to this section, see 2004 House Journal 2612.

Sec. 44.31.025.
Building safety account.

The building safety account is created in the state treasury. The legislature may appropriate money from the account for necessary costs incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development in the administration of AS 05.20, AS

18.60.180

—

18.60.395

,

18.60.800

—

18.60.820

, and AS 18.62. Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund or dedicates the money in the account for a specific purpose.

History.

(§ 6 ch 96 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 87 SLA 2004)

Secs. 44.31.100 — 44.31.200.
Employment Advisory Commission. [Repealed, § 4 ch 74 SLA 1969.]